Utah statutes.
62A-11-507.   Payor's procedures for income withholding.
(1) (a)  A payor is subject to the requirements, penalties, and effects of a
notice mailed or delivered to him under Section 62A-11-506.
(b)  A payment of withheld income mailed to the office in an envelope
postmarked within seven business days of the date the amount would have been
paid or credited to the obligor but for this section satisfies Subsection
62A-11-506(1)(c).
(2)  If a payor fails to comply with the requirements of a notice served upon
him under Section 62A-11-506, the obligee, or obligor may proceed with a civil
action against the payor to enforce a provision of the notice.
(3)  If the obligor's child support is owed monthly and the payor's pay
periods are at more frequent intervals, the payor, with the consent of the
office or obligee, may withhold an equal amount at each pay period
cumulatively sufficient to pay the monthly child support obligation.
(4)  A payor may combine amounts which he has withheld from the income of
multiple obligors into a single payment to the office.  If such a combined
payment is made, the payor shall specify the amount attributable to each
individual obligor by name and Social Security number.
(5)  In addition to any other remedy provided in this section, a payor is
liable to the obligee or obligor for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees
incurred in enforcing a provision of the notice mailed or delivered under
Section 62A-11-506.
(6)  Notwithstanding this section or Section 62A-11-506, if a payor receives
an income withholding order or notice issued by another state, the payor shall
apply the income withholding law of the state of the obligor's principal place
of business in determining:
(a)  the payor's fee for processing income withholding;
(b)  the maximum amount permitted to be withheld from the obligor's income;
(c)  the time periods within which the payor must implement income withholding
and forward child support payments;
(d)  the priorities for withholding and allocating withheld income for
multiple child support obligees; and
(e)  any terms or conditions for withholding not specified in the notice.
